Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1962
Voting requirements.

(a) Unless the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, the articles, or the bylaws require a greater vote or voting by class, if a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of the votes represented and voting (which affirmative votes also constitute a majority of the required quorum) is the act of the members.

(b) A bylaw amendment to increase or decrease the vote required for any member action must be approved by the members.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 62.